New York, session 2025-2026, A3068.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 597 of the labor law, as added by 2 chapter 705 of the laws of 1944 and renumbered by chapter 663 of the 3 laws of 1946, is amended to read as follows: 4 1. Issuance. The validity of the claim and the amount of benefits 5 payable to the claimant shall be determined in accordance with the regu- 6 lations and procedure established by the commissioner and, when such 7 determination is issued by the commissioner, it shall be deemed the 8 initial determination of the claim. Notwithstanding any law, rule or 9 regulation to the contrary, the commissioner shall provide notice to 10 each claimant of such initial determination of approval or denial of the 11 claim no later than thirty days after the claimant has furnished all 12 information required under paragraph (a) of subdivision two of this 13 section. If the commissioner is unable to issue a determination within 14 such prescribed time frame due to exigent circumstances, such notice 15 shall inform the claimant of the new estimated time frame for the issu- 16 ance of a determination, the retroactive effective date the claimant 17 would receive benefits from if approved, and how the claimant may 18 confirm the status of the determination if it is not received by the new 19 estimated time frame. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05529-01-5